District of Columbia statutes.
22-3703

Bias-related crime.

A person charged with and found guilty of a bias-related crime shall be fined not more than 11 /2 times the maximum fine authorized for the designated act and imprisoned for not more than 11 /2 times the maximum term authorized for the designated act.

History

May 8, 1990, D.C. Law 8-121, § 4, 37 DCR 27

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-4003.